Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Diabetes Coverage

§ 26-20-201.
Diabetes coverage required.

All individual and group health insurance policies providing coverage on an expense incurred basis, individual and group service or indemnity type contracts issued by any insurer including any nonprofit corporation and individual and group service contracts issued by a health maintenance organization, which provide coverage shall also provide coverage for the equipment, supplies and outpatient self-management training and education, including medical nutrition therapy for the treatment of insulin-dependent diabetes, insulin-using diabetes, gestational diabetes and noninsulin using diabetes if prescribed by a health care professional legally authorized to prescribe such items under law. Covered diabetes outpatient self-management training and education shall be provided by a certified, registered or licensed health care professional with expertise in diabetes. For purposes of this section, required covered outpatient self-management training and education shall be limited to:

A one-time evaluation and training program when medically necessary, within one (1) year of diagnosis;

Additional medically necessary self-management training shall be provided upon a significant change in symptoms, condition or treatment. This additional training shall be limited to three (3) hours per year.

The benefits provided under this section shall be subject to the same annual deductibles or coinsurance established for all other covered benefits within a given policy. Private third-party payors may not reduce or eliminate coverage due to the requirements of this section. Enforcement of this section shall be performed by the commissioner or his designee.

This section shall apply to a private health benefit plan as defined under W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xxxiii) delivered or issued on or after July 1, 2001.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 142, § 1.